District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Ivy City Resilience Hub Eminent Domain Authority Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Findings.
The Council finds that:
(1) In 2022, the District of Columbia Commission on Climate Change & Resiliency
issued its second report as required by the Commission on Climate Change and Resiliency
Establishment Act 0f 2016. One of 11 core recommendations advanced by the commission was
for the District to establish resilience hubs across the District to “support District residents by
coordinating communication, distributing resources, and reducing carbon pollution while
enhancing the community’s quality of life.” 1 As the report explains,
Resilience Hubs serve communities in three operating states: Steady, Disruption, and
Recovery. During their steady states, resilience hubs serve communities year-round by
promoting health, providing meeting spaces, educating the community about emergency
preparedness, reducing risks, and supporting workforce development.
Second Report of the District of Columbia Commission on Climate Change & Resiliency,
2022, available at https://lims.dccouncil.gov/downloads/LIMS/51693/Introduction/RC24-0237-
Introduction.pdf?Id=150315.



When disasters and stressors occur, Resilience Hubs can shift to a Disruption state, using
their onsite power generation, communications technology, and community relationships
to complement District and federal emergency response services. During a Disruption
state, resilience hubs can serve as a known staging area and partner to distribute supplies
and information to affected communities. Following a disaster, resilience hubs can
support recovery by providing space for casework, educating the community about
recovery resources, and conducting long term assessments of disaster recovery.2

(2) The administration of Mayor Muriel Bower has also twice endorsed the concept of
community resilience hubs—first in the 2016 Climate Ready DC Report and again in the 2019
Resilient DC Report. Among the goals established in Resilient DC was the “Launch the
Resilience Hubs and Resilience Corps programs by 2023.”3
(3) While the District has taken strides toward constructing a pilot community resilience
center in Ward 7, the District has taken no concrete steps towards establishing a community
resilience hub in Ward 5. While the Office of Planning’s draft Small Area Plan for Ivy City, N.E.
recommends launching “a Resilience Hub within the new Crummell School Community Center,”
neither the Department of Recreation nor the Department of General Services have identified
that as a priority for the facility in ongoing capital planning processes.
(4) The District has identified a site located at 1950 Capitol Avenue, N.E., south of
Fenwick Street, N.E., Square 4043, Lot 0806, (the “Capitol Street Site”) as a strong site for a
community resilience hub because it is located in Ivy City, a neighborhood where residents
suffer significant heat island effects, urban flooding, and air pollution; is well-situated to serve as
a recruitment center for green jobs because it is proximate to existing neighborhood housing; and
is also well situated to serve as a staging area during a disruption because of the site’s access to
Id.
3Resilient DC: A Strategy to Thrive in the Face of Change, 2019, available at
https://app.box.com/s/8w2eqpt0yczj7ldga74m7gcpf1ts79y7.


the community and to major arterial roads and infrastructure.
(5) The Capitol Street Site is currently occupied by a seal manufacturing facility.
(6) Acquisition of the Capitol Street Site will allow the District to construct a community
resilience hub in Ivy City.
Sec. 3 Exercise of Eminent Domain
The Mayor may exercise eminent domain in accordance with the procedures set forth in
subchapter II of Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code to acquire Lot
806 Square 4043 for a community resilience hub.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.